sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Pomôcky na holenie a zastrihávanie brady a fúzov: Voda po holení; Balzamy na bradu; Hrebene a kefy na bradu; Kondicionér na bradu; Olej na bradu; Šampón a umývací prostriedok na bradu; Bieliaci krém na ochlpenie na tele a tvári; Príslušenstvo k elektrickým holiacim strojčekom; Elektrické holiace strojčeky; Príslušenstvo pre strihacie strojčeky a zastrihávače brady a fúzov; Strihacie strojčeky a zastrihávače brady a fúzov; Epilácia; Vosk na fúzy; Olej pred holením; Žiletky a čepele do žiletiek; Misky a hrnčeky na holenie; Štetky na holenie; Krémy na holenie; Súpravy na holenie; Holiace mydlo; Kamencové ceruzky
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Golenie i strzyżenie: Płyny po goleniu; Balsamy do brody; Grzebienie i szczotki do brody; Odżywka do brody; Olejek do brody; Szampon do brody; Rozjaśniacze owłosienia twarzy i ciała; Akcesoria do golarek elektrycznych; Golarki elektryczne; Akcesoria do trymerów do włosów; Trymery do włosów; Usuwanie włosów; Wosk do wąsów; Olejek przed goleniem; Maszynki i ostrza do golenia; Miseczki i kubki do golenia; Pędzle do golenia; Kremy do golenia; Zestawy do golenia; Mydło do golenia; Sztyfty do tamowania krwawienia
hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Borotválkozás és ápolás: Borotválkozás utáni balzsam; Szakállbalzsamok; Szakállfésűk és -kefék; Szakállöblítő; Szakállolaj; Szakállsampon és -mosó; Test- és arcszőrzetszőkítő; Elektromosborotva-kiegészítők; Elektromos borotvák; Hajvágó és trimmer-kiegészítők; Hajvágók és trimmerek; Szőrtelenítés; Bajuszviasz; Borotválkozás előtti olaj; Borotvák és borotvapengék; Borotvatálak és -bögrék; Borotvakefék; Borotvakrémek; Borotválkozókészletek; Borotvaszappan; Staptikus ceruzák
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > การโกนหนวดและการเสริมสวย: ผลิตภัณฑ์หลังการโกน; บาล์มบำรุงเครา; หวีและแปรงเครา; ครีมนวดเครา; น้ำมันบำรุงเครา; แชมพูและผลิตภัณฑ์ทำความสะอาดเครา; น้ำยาฟอกสีขนตามร่างกาย; อุปกรณ์ที่โกนหนวดไฟฟ้า; ที่โกนหนวดไฟฟ้า; อุปกรณ์ตัดแต่งขนและผม; คลิปเปอร์และทริมเมอร์ไฟฟ้า; ที่ถอนขน; แว็กซ์จัดหนวด; น้ำมันก่อนโกน; ที่โกนหนวดและใบมีด; ถ้วยและขันสำหรับการโกนหนวด; แปรงโกนหนวด; ครีมโกนหนวด; ชุดโกนหนวด; สบู่โกนหนวด; สารช่วยห้ามเลือด
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Бръснене и подстригване: Афтършейв; Балсами за брада; Гребени и четки за брада; Кондиционер за брада; Масло за брада; Шампоани и средства за измиване на брада; Изсветлител за окосмяване по тялото и лицето; Аксесоари за електрически самобръсначки; Електрически самобръсначки; Аксесоари за машинки за подстригване и тримери; Машинки за подстригване и тримери; Обезкосмяване; Вакса за мустаци; Масло преди бръснене; Бръсначи и ножчета за бръснене; Купички и чаши за бръснене; Четки за бръснене; Кремове за бръснене; Комплекти за бръснене; Сапун за бръснене; Кръвоспиращи моливи със стипца
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Ξύρισμα & περιποίηση: Aftershave; Βάλσαμα γενειάδας; Χτένες και βούρτσες γενειάδας; Μαλακτικό γενειάδας; Λάδι γενειάδας; Σαμπουάν γενειάδας; Αποχρωστικά σώματος & προσώπου; Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρικών ξυριστικών μηχανών; Ηλεκτρικές ξυριστικές μηχανές; Αξεσουάρ για κουρευτικές μηχανές & ξυριστικές μηχανές; Κουρευτικές μηχανές & ψαλίδια; Αποτρίχωση; Κερί μουστακιού; Λάδι για πριν το ξύρισμα; Ξυριστικές μηχανές & λεπίδες ξυραφιού; Μπολ & κούπες ξυρίσματος; Πινέλα ξυρίσματος; Κρέμες ξυρίσματος; Κιτ ξυρίσματος; Σαπούνι ξυρίσματος; Γραφίδες χάραξης με οξύ
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Holení a péče o vzhled: Vody po holení; Balzámy na vousy; Hřebeny a kartáče na vousy; Kondicionér na vousy; Olej na vousy; Šampon a mycí prostředek na vousy; Zesvětlovače chloupků na těle a obličeji; Elektrické holicí strojky – příslušenství; Elektrické holicí strojky; Strojky na stříhání vlasů – příslušenství; Strojky na stříhání vlasů; Odstraňování chloupků; Vosk na kníry; Olej před holením; Břitvy a žiletky; Misky a hrnky na holení; Štětky na holení; Krém na holení; Sady na holení; Mýdlo na holení; Prostředky proti krvácení
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Insaponatura e rasatura: Dopobarba; Balsami per la barba; Pettini e spazzole per la barba; Balsamo per la barba; Olio per la barba; Shampoo e sapone per la barba; Decolorante per peli di corpo e viso; Accessori rasoi elettrici; Rasoi elettrici; Accessori per tagliacapelli e tagliabasette; Tagliacapelli e tagliabasette; Depilazione; Cera per baffi; Olio pre-rasatura; Rasoi e lame per rasoi; Ciotole e tazze per rasatura; Pennelli da barba; Creme da barba; Kit da barba; Sapone da barba; Matite emostatiche
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Rasage et soins: Après-rasage; Baumes pour barbe; Peignes et brosses pour barbe; Après-shampooings pour barbe; Huiles pour barbe; Shampooings et nettoyants pour barbe; Produits de décoloration des poils; Accessoires pour rasoir électrique; Rasoirs électriques; Accessoires pour tondeuses et coupe-cheveux; Tondeuses à cheveux; Épilation; Cires pour moustache; Huiles de pré-rasage; Rasoirs et lames de rechange; Bols et tasses de rasage; Blaireaux de rasage; Crèmes de rasage; Coffrets de rasage; Savons de rasage; Crayons styptiques
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Karvanpoisto ja parranajo: Aftershave; Partabalsami; Partakampa ja -harja; Partahoitoaine; Partaöljy; Partashampoo ja parran pesu; Ihokarvojen valkaisu; Sähköparranajokoneiden lisätarvikkeet; Sähköparranajokoneet; Hiustenleikkauskoneiden ja trimmerien lisätarvikkeet; Hiustenleikkauskoneet ja trimmerit; Karvanpoisto; Viiksivaha; Parranajoöljy; Parranajokoneet ja partaterät; Parranajokulhot ja -kupit; Partasudit; Parranajovoiteet; Parranajosetit; Parranajosaippua; Alunatikut
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > シェービング・脱毛: アフターシェーブ; ひげ用バーム; ひげ用コームとブラシ; ひげ用コンディショナー; ひげ用オイル; ひげ用シャンプー・ウォッシュ; 顔・体用脱色剤; 電動シェーバー関連用品; 電動シェーバー; バリカン・鼻毛カッター関連用品; バリカン・鼻毛カッター; 脱毛; 口ひげ用ワックス; プレシェーブオイル; シェーバー・替刃; シェービングボウル; シェービングブラシ; シェービングクリーム; シェービングキット; シェービングソープ; 鉛筆型止血剤
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Tıraş ve Kişisel Bakım: Tıraş Losyonları; Sakal Balsamları; Sakal Tarakları ve Fırçaları; Sakal Kremi; Sakal Yağı; Sakal Şampuanı ve Temizleyici; Vücut ve Yüz Tüyü Ağartıcısı; Tıraş Makinesi Aksesuarları; Tıraş Makineleri; Saç Kesme ve Düzeltme Makinesi Aksesuarları; Saç Kesme ve Düzeltme Makineleri; Tüy Alma; Bıyık Mumu; Tıraş Öncesi Yağ; Jiletler ve Usturalar; Traş Kaseleri ve Kupaları; Tıraş Fırçaları; Tıraş Kremleri; Tıraş Setleri; Tıraş Sabunu; Yara Kalemleri
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 刮鬍修容: 鬚後水; 鬍鬚膏; 鬍鬚梳及刷; 鬍鬚護理素; 鬍鬚油; 鬍鬚洗髮精; 體毛/汗毛漂白劑; 電動刮鬍刀配件; 電動刮鬍刀; 理髮/修髮器配件; 電動剪髮器; 除毛用品; 鬍鬚蠟; 剃前油; 手動刮鬍刀和刀片; 刮鬍碗/杯; 刮鬍刷; 刮鬍膏; 刮鬍組; 剃鬚皂; 止血筆
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Brijanje i uređivanje: Losion poslije brijanja; Balzami za bradu; Češljevi i četke za bradu; Regenerator za bradu; Ulje za bradu; Šampon i sredstvo za pranje brade; Izbjeljivač dlačica na tijelu i licu; Pribor za električne britvice; Električne britvice; Dodaci za mašinice za šišanje i trimere; Mašinice za šišanje i trimeri; Uklanjanje dlaka; Vosak za brkove; Ulje prije brijanja; Britvice i žileti; Zdjelice i šalice za brijanje; Četkice za brijanje; Kreme za brijanje; Kompleti za brijanje; Sapun za brijanje; Štapići stipse
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Afeitado y arreglo personal: Loción para después de afeitarse; Bálsamos de barba; Peines y cepillos de barba; Acondicionador de barba; Aceite de barba; Champú y lavado de barba; Decolorante para pelo corporal y facial; Accesorios para afeitadoras eléctricas; Máquinas de afeitar eléctricas; Accesorios para recortadores y cortadores de pelo; Recortadores y cortadores de pelo; Depilación; Cera de bigote; Aceite pre-afeitado; Afeitadoras y cuchillas; Boles y tazas de afeitado; Brochas de afeitar; Cremas de afeitar; Kits de afeitado; Jabón de afeitar; Lápiz estíptico
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Barbering og personlig pleje: Aftershave; Skægbalsam; Skægkamme og børster; Skægbalsam; Skægolie; Skægshampoo og vask; Hårblegemiddel til krop og ansigt; Tilbehør til elektriske barbermaskiner; Elektriske barbermaskiner; Tilbehør til hårklippere og trimmere; Hårklippere og trimmere; Hårfjerning; Overskægsvoks; Olie til før barberingen; Barberknive og barberblade; Skåle og kopper til barbering; Barberbørster; Barberskum; Barbersæt; Barberssæbe; Alunstifter
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Bărbierit și îngrijire: Aftershave; Balsamuri pentru barbă; Piepteni și perii pentru barbă; Balsam pentru barbă; Ulei pentru barbă; Șampon și gel de spălare pentru barbă; Produse pentru decolorarea părului facial și corporal; Accesorii pentru aparatul de ras electric; Aparate de ras electrice; Accesorii pentru mașini de tuns și scurtat; Mașini de tuns și scurtat; Îndepărtarea părului; Ceară pentru mustață; Ulei înainte de bărbierit; Aparate de ras și lame de ras; Boluri și căni pentru bărbierit; Perii pentru bărbierit; Creme de ras; Truse de bărbierit; Săpun de ras; Creioane hemostatice
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Barbering og kroppspleie: Aftershave; Skjeggbalsamer; Skjeggkammer og børster; Skjeggbalsam; Skjeggolje; Skjeggsjampo og -vask; Blekemidler for kropps- og ansiktshår; Tilbehør til elektriske barbermaskiner; Elektriske barbermaskiner; Tilbehør til hårklippere og -trimmere; Hårklippere og -trimmere; Hårfjerning; Bartevoks; Olje til før barbering; Barberhøvler og barberblader; Barberboller og -kopper; Barberbørster; Barberkremer; Barbersett; Barbersåpe; Blodstillende stifter
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Rasieren & Trimmen: Rasierwasser; Bartbalsame; Bartkämme & -bürsten; Bart-Conditioner (Bartspülung); Bartöl; Bartshampoo & Bartwaschmittel; Haaraufheller; Zubehör für elektrische Rasierer; Elektrorasierer; Zubehör für Haarschneidegeräte & Trimmer; Haar- & Bartschneider; Haarentfernung; Schnurrbartwachs; Pre-Shave-Öl; Rasierer & Rasierklingen; Rasierschalen; Rasierpinsel; Rasiercremes; Rasiersets; Rasierseife; Alaunstifte
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Depilação e barbear: Aftershave; Bálsamos para barba; Pentes e escovas para barba; Condicionador de barba; Óleo de barba; Champô e sabonete para barba; Descolorante corporal e facial; Acessórios de máquinas de barbear; Máquinas de barbear; Acessórios de máquinas de cortar o cabelo; Máquinas de cortar o cabelo; Remoção de pelo; Cera para bigode; Óleo pré-barbear; Lâminas de barbear e recargas; Taças e canecas de barbear; Escovas de barbear; Cremes de barbear; Kits de barbear; Sabonete de barbear; Lápis hemostáticos
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Britje in urejanje: Vodica po britju; Balzami za brado; Glavniki in krtače za brado; Kondicioner za brado; Olje za brado; Šampon in gel za pranje brade; Belilo za telo in obraz; Dodatki za električne brivnike; Električni brivniki; Dodatki za strižnike in prirezovalnike za dlake; Strižniki in prirezovalniki za dlake; Odstranjevanje dlak; Vosek za brke; Olje pred britjem; Brivniki in rezila za britvice; Sklede in skodelice za britje; Čopiči za britje; kreme za britje; Kompleti za britje; Milo za britje; Paličice za zaustavljanje krvavitev
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Chăm sóc ngoại hình: Sản phẩm sau cạo râu; Sáp dưỡng râu; Lược và bàn chải râu; Dầu xả râu; Dầu dưỡng râu; Dầu gội và dung dịch rửa râu; Kem làm nhạt màu lông mặt và thân; Phụ kiện máy cạo râu; Máy cạo râu; Phụ kiện tông đơ cắt tóc; Tông đơ cắt tóc; Tẩy lông; Sáp vuốt ria mép; Dầu dưỡng trước cạo râu; Dao cạo và lưỡi dao cạo; Bát và ca cạo râu; Cọ cạo râu; Kem cạo râu; Bộ dụng cụ cạo dâu; Xà phòng cạo râu; Bút cầm máu
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Shaving & Grooming: Aftershave; Beard Balms; Beard Combs & Brushes; Beard Conditioner; Beard Oil; Beard Shampoo & Wash; Body & Facial Hair Bleach; Electric Razor Accessories; Electric Razors; Hair Clipper & Trimmer Accessories; Hair Clippers & Trimmers; Hair Removal; Moustache Wax; Pre-Shave Oil; Razors & Razor Blades; Shaving Bowls & Mugs; Shaving Brushes; Shaving Creams; Shaving Kits; Shaving Soap; Styptic Pencils
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Scheren en gezichtsbeharing: Aftershaves; Baard balsems; Baard kammen en borstels; Baard conditioner; Baard olie; Baard shampoo en wasproducten; Bleekmiddel voor lichaams- en gezichtshaar; Accessoires voor elektrische scheerapparaten; Elektrische scheerapparaten; Accessoires voor tondeuses; Tondeuses en trimmers; Ontharing; Snor wax; Pre-scheer olie; Scheerapparaten en scheermessen; Scheerkommen en -bakjes; Scheerkwasten; Scheercrèmes; Scheerkits; Scheerzeep; Styptische potloden
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 剃须/美容: 须后水; 胡须膏; 胡须梳和刷; 胡须护发素; 胡须油; 胡须洗发水; 身体和面部毛发漂白剂; 电动剃须刀配件; 电动剃须刀; 电推剪和理发器配件; 电推剪和理发器; 脱毛; 胡子蜡; 剃须前油; 剃须刀与剃须刀片; 剃须碗/剃须杯; 剃须刷; 剃须膏; 剃须套装; 剃须皂; 止血笔
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Rakning och ansning: Aftershave; Skäggbalsam; Skäggkammar och borstar; Skäggbalsam; Skäggolja; Skäggschampo och tvätt; Blekningsmedel för kropps- och ansiktshår; Tillbehör till rakapparater; Elektriska rakapparater; Tillbehör till hårklippare och trimmers; Hårklippare och trimmers; Hårborttagning; Mustaschvax; Pre-shave olja; Rakhyvlar och rakblad; Rakskålar och -muggar; Rakborstar; Rakkrämer; Rakningspaket; Raktvål; Alunstift
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Skutimasis ir barzdos bei ūsų priežiūra: Priemonės po skutimosi; Barzdos balzamai; Barzdos šukos ir šepečiai; Barzdos kondicionierius; Barzdos aliejus; Barzdos šampūnas ir priežiūros priemonės; Kūno ir veido plaukų šviesikliai; Elektrinių skustuvų priedai; Elektriniai skustuvai; Plaukų kirpimo mašinėlių ir kirptukų priedai; Plaukų kirpimo mašinėlės ir kirptukai; Plaukų šalinimas; Ūsų vaškas; Priešskutiminis aliejus; Skustuvai ir skustuvų peiliukai; Skutimosi dubenys ir puodeliai; Skutimosi šepečiai; Skutimosi kremai; Skutimosi rinkiniai; Skutimosi muilas; Kraujavimą stabdantys pieštukai
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Barbearia e embelezamento: Loção pós-barba; Bálsamos para barba; Pentes e escovas para barba; Condicionador para barba; Óleo para barba; Shampoo e sabonete para barba; Clareadores de pelos para o corpo e rosto; Acessórios para barbeadores elétricos; Barbeadores elétricos; Acessórios para aparadores de cabelo; Máquinas e tesouras para cortar cabelo; Depilação; Cera para bigode; Óleo pré-barba; Navalhas e lâminas de barbear; Tigelas e canecas de barbear; Pincéis de barba; Cremes de barbear; Kits de barbear; Sabão de barbear; Lápis vasoconstritor
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Бритье и удаление волос: Средства после бритья; Бальзамы для бороды; Расчески и щетки для бороды; Кондиционер для бороды; Масло для бороды; Шампунь и средство для мытья бороды; Кремы для осветления волос на лице и теле; Аксессуары для электробритв; Электробритвы; Аксессуары для триммеров и машинок для стрижки волос; Триммеры и машинки для стрижки волос; Удаление волос; Воск для усов; Масло для бритья; Бритвы и лезвия; Чаши для бритья; Помазки; Кремы для бритья; Наборы для бритья; Мыло для бритья; Кровоостанавливающие карандаши
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 면도/체모 손질: 애프터셰이브 로션; 비어드 밤; 비어드 빗 및 브러시; 비어드 컨디셔너; 비어드 오일; 비어드 샴푸 및 워시; 체모 탈색제; 전기 면도기 부대용품; 전기 면도기; 이발기 부대용품; 이발기/체모 정리기; 제모 용품; 콧수염 왁스; 면도 전 오일; 면도기/면도날; 면도 볼/머그; 면도솔; 면도 크림; 면도 키트; 면도 비누; 지혈 스틱